Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 11. Determination of Liability - Putative Holder Remedies

38-13-1101.
Informal conference.

Not later than thirty days after receipt of a notice under section 38-13-1011, a putative holder may request an informal conference with the administrator to review the determination. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the administrator may designate an employee to act on behalf of the administrator.

If a putative holder makes a timely request under subsection (1) of this section for an informal conference:

Not later than twenty days after the date of the request, the administrator shall set the time and place of the conference;

The administrator shall give the putative holder notice in a record of the time and place of the conference;

The conference may be held in person, by telephone, or by electronic means, as determined by the administrator;

The request tolls the ninety-day period under sections 38-13-1103 and 38-13-1104 until notice of a decision under subsection (2)(g) of this section has been given to the putative holder or the putative holder withdraws the request for the conference;

The conference may be postponed, adjourned, and reconvened as the administrator determines appropriate;

The administrator or administrator’s designee, with the approval of the administrator, may modify a determination made under section 38-13-1011 or withdraw it; and

The administrator shall issue a decision in a record and provide a copy of the record to the putative holder and examiner not later than twenty days after the conference ends.

A conference under subsection (2) of this section is not an administrative remedy and is not a contested case subject to the “State Administrative Procedure Act”, article 4 of title 24. An oath is not required and the rules of evidence do not apply in the conference.

At a conference under subsection (2) of this section, the putative holder shall be given an opportunity to confer informally with the administrator and the person that examined the records of the putative holder to:

Discuss the determination made under section 38-13-1011; and

Present any issue concerning the validity of the determination.

If the administrator fails to act within the period prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the failure does not affect a right of the administrator; except that interest does not accrue on the amount for which the putative holder was determined to be liable under section 38-13-1011 during the period in which the administrator failed to act until the earlier of:

The date under section 38-13-1103 when the putative holder initiates administrative review or files an action under section 38-13-1104; or

Ninety days after the putative holder received notice of the administrator’s determination under section 38-13-1011 if no review was initiated under section 38-13-1103 and no action was filed under section 38-13-1104.

The administrator may hold an informal conference with a putative holder about a determination under section 38-13-1011 without a request at any time before the putative holder initiates administrative review under section 38-13-1103 or files an action under section 38-13-1104.

Interest and penalties under section 38-13-1204 continue to accrue on property not reported, paid, or delivered as required by this article 13 after the initiation, and during the pendency, of an informal conference under this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 450, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1102.
Review of administrator’s determination.

A putative holder may seek relief from a determination under section 38-13-1011 or 38-13-1205 by:

Administrative review under section 38-13-1103; or

Judicial review under section 38-13-1104.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 451, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1103.
Administrative review.

Not later than ninety days after receiving notice of the administrator’s determination under section 38-13-1011 or that a civil penalty has been imposed under section 38-13-1205, a putative holder or a holder may initiate a proceeding under the “State Administrative Procedure Act”, article 4 of title 24, for review of the administrator’s determination.

A final decision in an administrative proceeding initiated under subsection (1) of this section is subject to judicial review by the district court for the city and county of Denver.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 451, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-1104.
Judicial remedy.

Not later than ninety days after receiving notice of the administrator’s determination under section 38-13-1011 or that a civil penalty has been imposed under section 38-13-1205, a putative holder or a holder may:

File an action against the administrator in the district court for the city and county of Denver, challenging all or part of the administrator’s determination of liability or imposition of a civil penalty and seeking a declaration that the determination or imposition is unenforceable, in whole or in part; or

Pay the civil penalty or pay the amount or deliver the property the administrator determined must be paid or delivered to the administrator and, not later than six months after payment or delivery, file an action against the administrator in the district court for the city and county of Denver for a refund of all or part of the amount paid or return of all or part of the property delivered.

If a holder pays a civil penalty or a putative holder pays or delivers property determined by the administrator to be paid or delivered to the administrator at any time after the holder or putative holder files an action under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court shall continue the action as if it had been filed originally as an action for a refund or return of property under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

On the final determination of an action filed under subsection (1) of this section, the court may, on application, award to the plaintiff their reasonable attorney fees, costs, and expenses of litigation.

A holder or putative holder that is the prevailing party in an action under subsection (1) of this section for refund of money paid to the administrator is entitled to interest on the amount refunded, at the same rate a holder is required to pay to the administrator under section 38-13-1204 (1), from the date paid to the administrator until the date of the refund.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 452, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.